This is an argument for maternal nursing to reduce infant mortality. Dr. Levy does not place much responsibility on poverty as a cause of loss of infants, but emphasizes the effect of women in industries. He argues for education of the midwife because she is the family adviser of many foreign-born groups. He argues from results in Newark.
Here is the opinion of a teacher. He attacks the problems of school hygiene from the practical viewpoint of a layman who is a daily worker in the schoolroom itself. He expresses some very radical opinions, but he gets at them honestly and through his own experience.
Whites rather than colored people were attacked by the pandemic of influenza and the young rather than the old, a reversal of usual conditions. These conclusions are based on the accurate figures obtainable from 12,000,000 policies and 105,552 claims.
It took an American, Dr. W. W. Peter, to break down the conservatism of the Chinese in matters of health and hygiene. He accomplished this because he understood the psychology of the people. Rattling toys and fascinating gimcracks furnished ammunition for a great health education campaign, continued today by Dr. S. M. Woo.
Colleges are generally weak in public health administration, according to this author. Standards for milk and water supplies are low, ventilation is a closed book, supervised exercise is usually wanting, personal hygiene instruction is not followed up, and off-campus living is little supervised. Here, where example is needed, health administration is often hap-hazard, usually inexpert.
Against a decline in prevalence of many diseases and a generally decreasing mortality in the past fifty years, the pneumonia-bronchitis-influenza rate is today higher than in 1871. It is indeed the only bacterial group of maladies the prevalence of which has not diminished.
Too many cooks in health administration is the impending danger, suggests Dr. Rankin. It is time for the A.P.H.A. to insist on a "whole-time" Health Department for the Central Government. Health and medical associations should coöperate to effect this. They should find out what needs to be done and use their influence to have it done.
That almost any bit of water will serve for a wading pool seems to be the idea in practice. Dr. Craster has tested such pools and finds that they need to be as well constructed as bathing pools and as well cared for. Chlorination is necessary when they can not otherwise be controlled.
Plain talk with the suggestion that the health officer has police powers oftentimes neglected to assume voluntary work not really within his province. Dr. Hill emphasizes the need of official fighting of disease and would leave baby weeks and milk depots to voluntary, civil organizations.
A score card for health officers is a novel suggestion, but nevertheless one in accord with good common sense. Mr. Tobey argues that a responsible business executive is chosen with great care, and a health officer has more responsibility than most business executives. In his scale professional qualities are given the lowest place and personal qualities, the highest.
At the Chicago meeting this author spoke in the General Sessions and was asked to continue beyond the time limit. There was discussion and endorsement. It was characterized to be a treatment of the older fashion much employed by physicians during the epidemic.
Many endemic centres of communicable disease lie in the Orient and therefore the future fight of preventive medicine must be largely in Eastern countries. Mr. Jenks, with some years of experience in Hindustan as sanitary engineer, outlines racial conditions that are fundamental. They must be recognized in any plan for bettered sanitation.
Science does not yet differentiate between B. coli from various animal sources. Water showing fecal contaminatin may not have been polluted by man, and may be free from typhoid, paratyphoid, dysentery, etc. Condemnation as well as approval, therefore, should always be very carefully considered.
Colonel Cumming extends the trail he blazed in the matter of in-sanitary dishwashing. He finds in institutions that wash by hand in lukewarm water that there was three times the incidence of influenza-pneumonia that there was in institutions with steam dishwashing. His conclusions are based on an institution population of 252,186.
No health officer can afford to ignore the educational value of publicity. But such announcements are so foreign to old-fashioned medical ideas that publicity is needed to give publicity its proper place. This author does good missionary work in outlining what publicity is doing for his specialty.
"There is much illness that might have been avoided if there had been an organized system of state medicine," says Sir Arthur Newsholme, speaking of England. He would give a freer hand to the health officer who measures up to the standard. England's chief defect lies in the existence of small and inefficient local health bodies.
Science has not yet revealed any successful specific measures against influenza. Isolation and popular education are the only justifiable general methods known at present. Energies must be directed to preventing the complications rather than to preventing influenza. Research is needed and health officers can help by securing accurate records.
Dr. Peters draws attention to the fact that no big work has been generally done to relieve those debilitated by influenza. There is hardship and need and slow recovery. Cincinnati organized relief along these lines, the Red Cross and the Health Department working in coöperation. Organization and results are given in some detail.
"Save 250,000 human lives in the United States in 1920!" is Surgeon Lumsden's slogan, and he backs it up by outlining how to do it. The world must have increase of man-power. Public health aid is essential. Needs are: whole-time health officers, effective local agencies and coördination of all agencies, and then the American spirit to "go over the top."
This author says that what the country needs is not extension of Federal authority so much as health education of the people to support what exists. The U. S. P. H. S. has already all the power that may constitutionally be given to a Federal health agency. It has a distinct industrial health program, and all it needs is good financial support.
For a type of Hindu conception of sanitary precaution, Mr. Jenks notes three kinds of "boiled" water: first, water merely heated till it steams; second, really boiled, but then strained through dirty cloths, and, third, really boiled, but cooled by adding raw water. Such practices and the distribution of drinking water in leather sacks, customs universally observed like the great gatherings of pilgrims, together with religious prejudices make sanitary progress very slow.
This author takes issue with Dr. Hill on the functions of health officers. He believes that they should undertake all kinds of public health work, that responsibility divided with private agencies will hurt the health officer's work, that public health education is necessary and that this must be conducted by the health officer if he is to fill adequately his sphere. Private agencies should bend their efforts to support the health officer.
Proper bacteriological dilutions are necessary for correct interpretations. The system here proposed adopts the dilution scale for its standards. On a consistent system of laboratory technique, including logical methods of computing results and a natural scale of interpretation, depends the real practicability of bacteriological standards.
Why did the husky succumb in the influenza-pneumonia epidemic, was arrested tuberculosis a protection, and what had the race factor to do with immunity? These are queries that Dr. Armstrong asks, and he has basis for his questionings in the observations of the Framingham survey. He gives health officers much food for thought.
Injury produces in the leaf-cells of the Indian Pipe (Monotropa uniflora) a darkening which is due to oxidation. The oxidation is much more rapid in the nucleus than in the cytoplasm and the facts indicate that this is also the case with the oxidation of the uninjured cell.
When Laminaria is exposed to the action of anesthetics (in sufficient concentration to produce any result) there is an increase in respiration. This may be followed by a decrease if the reagent is sufficiently toxic. No decrease is observed with low concentrations which are not toxic. These facts contradict the theory of Verworn that anesthesia is a kind of asphyxia, for his view is based upon the assumption that anesthetics decrease respiration.
1. Suboils of arid regions are certainly no less "raw" than those of semi-arid regions, and probably only slightly less so than those of humid regions. 2. If, as seems as yet unproved, inoculated legume seeds fail to develop on humid subsoil material, such failure can not justifiably be attributed as is done by Alway, McDole and Rost, to a lack of available phosphoric acid and potash. 3. A lack of available nitrogen probably is sufficient to account for rawness of subsoils. 4. The poor aeration of subsoils which indirectly results in their rawness, may be accounted for more simply than by Hilgard's explanation of the washing down of fine particles into the subsoil, which prevents proper aeration.
The catalytic activity of the blood of normal rabbits varies almost directly with the volume and number of red blood cells. This explains to a certain extent at least why animals of the same general degree of nutrition, and of the same litter, should have about the same activity since they are likely to have the same number of red blood cells, and why healthy large animals should read high while small poorly nourished ones should read low. Accompanying the hyperpyrexia resulting from puncture of the corpus striatum of a rabbit's brain, there is no change in either the catalytic activity of the blood or the white blood count. In experimentally produced peritonitis, the catalytic activity of the blood always rises, and is, therefore, absolutely independent of body temperature and white blood cells since one or both of these may rise, fall or remain stationary while the catalytic action increases.
I. Intraperitoneal injections of adrenalin into animals which are completely under the influence of phlorhizin and which are free from glycogen do not result in any extra elimination of sugar. This proves that adrenalin does not cause a conversion of fat into carbohydrates, as is maintained by Blum and by Eppinger, Falta and Rudinger. II. The high D:N ratio 5.2 and 6.1 reported by Eppinger, Falta and Rudinger after adrenalin injections in depancreatized dogs, which were obtained after short periods of six hours and four hours respectively, can be explained by the elimination of carbohydrates present in the organism. III. These results confirm the work of Straub and Ritzmann which indicates that adrenalin, by its constricting effect on the blood vessels, produces anemia of the tissues, resulting in imperfect oxidation, and this anemia is followed by the conversion of glycogen into dextrose by hyperglycemia and consequently by glycosuria.
A. The catalytic activity of the tissues of newly born and adult rabbits. 1. There is practically no difference between the catalytic power of the blood, brain or muscle of newly born and adult rabbits. 2. The kidneys and lungs are less active in the newly born, but increase rapidly during the first days of life. 3. The liver is more active in the newly born than in the adult rabbit. B. The catalytic activity of the developing hen's egg. 1. The entire fresh egg has a slight but definite catalytic power which remains practically constant even though the egg be kept for several months at room temperature. 2. The separate parts of the egg, germinal center, yolk and white have practically no activity when tested individually. 3. The entire unfertilized egg shows no catalytic activity even after incubation at 38 degrees C. for twenty-one days. 4. The germinal portion of the incubated fertilized egg rapidly acquires the power of decomposing hydrogen peroxide, while the yolk and white together or separately show no such increase, nor is there any activity to be found in the amniotic fluid. 5. It seems, therefore, that the catalytic power of the developing egg is formed from the contents of the egg which themselves show little action, by the developing germinal portion, independent of all external influences except heat (38 degrees C.) and air.
1. Guinea-pigs, naturally uninfected by sarcosporidia, were infected by feeding them with rat's muscle that was naturally infected by Sarcocystis muris, and by ripe mobile sporozoites from the same source. The infection was not visible grossly, but was detected upon very careful search through many sections of muscle. 2. Sarcosporidia were not found in the guinea-pigs until after an interval of 164 days from the first feeding, or 152 days after the most favorable feeding, when many teased-out mobile sporozoites were fed. 3. The prolonged period of incubation or latency, and the greater time required for infection of guinea-pigs here over that required by Negri (7) in Pavia, may be related to the fact that the experiment here was conducted in the tropics where the guinea-pig is a native. 4. Sarcosporidia of this apparently abortive type in unusual hosts cannot be specifically identified until their derivation and host relationships have been determined. 5. Morphologically, the guinea-pig sarcosporidia derived from Sarcocystis muris are identical with those found by the writer in the biceps of a Barbadian negro, and both probably represent abortive or aberrant forms.
The changes of the respiratory pressure within the esophagus, as well as within the posterior mediastinum, differ greatly in their various levels. They are best in the section between the heart and the diaphragm; they are moderate from the upper aperture of the thorax to above the tracheal bifurcation, and they are. very much reduced in the region of the bifurcation and the heart. In the latter case the normal respiratory changes are reduced in their transmission to the mediastinum by the intervention of the inelastic tissues of the bifurcation and the heart. The difference in the changes of the respiratory pressure between the low;er and the upper part of the mediastinum is due to a difference in the respiratory changes of pressure between the lower and upper parts of the lungs. The changes in the respiratory pressure which begin in the lower part of the lungs lose some of their force on their way to the apices of. the lungs. In artificial respiration by intratracheal insufflation there is no difference in the respiratory pressures between the upper and the lower parts of the lungs. This investigation supports the view, frequently entertained by clinicians, that the respiratory changes in the apices of the lungs are not as good as those of the rest of the lungs, and it disproves the claim of some physiologists that a decrease or increase of pressure at any part of the lungs must be equally distributed through all parts of the lungs, a claim based upon merely a priori physical considerations.
1. The administration of Staphylococcus aureus, killed by heat (vaccine), produces a high degree of opsonic immunity in rabbits. 2. Such increase of opsonin affords protection against living virulent staphylococcus in direct proportion to the amount of opsonins present in the serum and complete recovery may follow subsequent inoculation, if the opsonic power be high. 3. Frequent administration of vaccines may produce a diminution of the opsonic power of the serum. 4. Immune opsonins are most active against the homologous strain of Staphylococcus aureus, but are only slightly less active against heterologous strains. 5. Infections of the human body by Staphylococcus aureus may cause great increase of opsonins. 6. Vaccines prepared from Staphylococcus aureus may produce a high degree of opsonic immunity in man.
The examination of fifteen consecutive cases of primary tuberculous cervical adenitis resulted in the isolation of nine cultures of B. tuberculosis of bovine type and six cultures of human type, the classification being made on the basis of adaptability to artificial cultivation, character of growth on glycerine bouillon, virulence for rabbits, and, in three instances, virulence for calves. The results of the determination of the reaction changes in glycerine bouillon due to the growth of the cultures on this medium were in general accord with the classification as based on other characters. One culture otherwise of human type was found to give the slightly acid or even alkaline end reaction characteristic of the bovine type of bacillus. One culture, otherwise of bovine type, has so far given an end reaction more highly acid than is usual with bovine cultures. Two cultures, highly virulent for rabbits, showed even less adaptability to artificial cultivation than the usual true bovine cultures and the reaction change could not, therefore, be determined.
1. By an immediate anaphylactic reaction we mean the chain of symptoms which occur in highly sensitized guinea-pigs shortly after an intravenous or intracardiac injection of the toxic dose and usually end in death. 2. Immediate anaphylactic death occurs three to five minutes after the toxic injection in highly sensitized guinea-pigs. 3. Immediate anaphylactic death in guinea-pigs is caused by asphyxia; cessation of respiration is secondary to this asphyxia. 4. This asphyxia is apparently produced by a tetanic contraction of the smooth muscles of the bronchioles, which occludes their lumen gradually, so that finally no air enters or leaves the lung, in spite of violent respiratory efforts; the animal is strangulated. 5. The stage of complete broncho-constriction is preceded by a short broncho-dilatation, if the bronchioles have been in a state of tonus previous to the injection of the toxic dose. 6. Anatomically, the lungs of these guinea-pigs are typical and may be used as an indicator of the immediate anaphylactic state when the animal has been immobilized by curarin or by pithing. 7. The lungs of a guinea-pig killed by immediate anaphylaxis are distended and in an inspiratory position so that the diaphragm is pushed down; no marked collapse occurs when the chest is opened and when the lungs are excised in toto; their color is a pale bluish-pink ; the surfaces and borders are smooth; no foam is in the trachea or large bronchi; pieces of lung cut off do not collapse, float lightly on water, and contain a good amount of air and little fluid which escapes on pressure. The blood in the lungs and heart is black when the autopsy is made at once after the cessation of respiration. 8. Section of the vagi in the neck, or curarin (artificial respiration) exerts no appreciable effect on the development of immediate anaphylaxis. 9. This immobilization of the lungs, which is due to a broncho-constriction, is of peripheral origin, for destruction of the spinal cord and medulla affects in no appreciable way the promptness and extent of the typical lung response to the injection of the toxic dose. Artificial respiration is, of course, necessary. At the present time we do not care to state whether the toxic dose exerts its effects upon the bronchial muscles alone or upon the vagus motor endings or upon both structures. 10. The blood pressure in immediate anaphylaxis first shows a rise, which may be considerable; a short maintenance of this high level and then a gradual drop to IO to 20 millimeters of mercury and even less, within ten minutes after injection of the toxic dose. 11. Shortly after injection of the toxic dose a heart block develops, so that auricles and ventricles may beat in a 3:I rhythm; the block is probably due to asphyxia. 12. The cardiac vagus gradually loses its irritability after injection of the toxic dose. 13. Cooling of the guinea-pig delays the reaction to the toxic injection.
Apparently as a result of repeated passages through guinea pigs, the virulence of surra of Mauritius for mice became greatly attenuated. Three mice recovered spontaneously and two remained carriers of tryanosomes for four to seven weeks after the parasites were last seen in their blood. The mice that recovered acquired no lasting immunity. While the virulence of the parasites decreased for mice, it increased for guinea pigs. By cultivating the parasites in mice the virulence for these animals was restored after four to eight passages.
From the foregoing experiments, the conclusion may be drawn that B. bifidus communis of Tissier has an aerobic phase, in which it resembles B. mesentericus fuscus. Numerous intermediate phases can occur between these two extremes; and their morphological and biological variabilities demand the utmost attention in order to interpret more intelligently the various phases of a given organism, constantly found in the stools of sucklings, and to avoid the artificial creation of two or more organisms from a single microbic type.
By combining physiological and anatomical methods in the study of experimental nephritis it is possible to distinguish types of nephritis in which either tubular or vascular changes predominate, and are essentially characteristic of the lesion produced, but it is not possible to say that a given poison produces exclusively tubular or exclusively vascular lesions. The so-called epithelial poisons (potassium chromate, uranium nitrate and corrosive sublimate) present anatomical evidence of extensive tubular injury, and in the early stages show, on physiological study, no evidence of vascular injury other than exaggerated contraction and dilatation of the vessels and increased diuresis. On the other hand, the vascular poisons, arsenic and cantharidin, which produce but little injury to the tubules, tend to cause anuria and are characterized by minimal contraction and dilatation of the vessels and little or no flow of urine. From the physiological point of view these two types may be, for practical purposes, considered as examples of tubular and vascular nephritis. They are not, however, pure types; for the increased diuresis of the early tubular type is in itself evidence of vessel irritability and similar to the increased irritability caused by small doses of vascular poisons, and on the other hand, this essentially vascular lesion is accompanied by slight morphological changes in the tubular epithelium. Furthermore, the tubular lesions of chromium and uranium and corrosive sublimate pass into a stage closely resembling the vascular type, if not identical with it. Two forms of late tubular nephritis may be recognized. One of these, the anuric form, is accompanied by severe gastro-intestinal disturbance and evidence of approaching anuria; physiological tests show diminished power of dilatation of the vessels and corresponding inhibition of diuresis. The second form, the polyuric, is characterized by a condition of polyuria up to the moment of anesthesia; physiological tests show that the power of dilatation is retained, but little or no diuresis occurs. Whether the vascular incompetency of the anuric form of late tubular lesions is a natural consequence of the vessel irritability seen in the early stages or is the result of the elimination of secondary poisons through the glomeruli cannot be absolutely determined. The peculiar impermeability of the glomerulus following anesthetization in the polyuric form, which is essentially a stage of recovery, we hope to explain by investigations now in progress. Studies of the elimination of nitrogen show that in tubular nephritis, as represented by uranium nephritis, the output of nitrogen is considerably diminished. This apparently occurs also in chromate nephritis but is not clearly demonstrated. In both forms the onset of gastro-intestinal disturbances appears to bear a definite relation to the retention of nitrogen. On the other hand, as the nitrogen of the feces is not appreciably altered, these disturbances cannot be explained by the elimination through the intestine of toxic bodies of nitrogenous nature. The nitrogen elimination in the urine in vascular nephritis as represented by arsenic nephritis is not only not diminished but is greatly increased as the result of the increased metabolism caused by arsenic. If at the height of this increased elimination, uranium nitrate is administered, the nitrogen output is markedly diminished. These observations demonstrate that not only are the tubular lesions in arsenic nephritis of little moment, but also that serious injury of the epithelium, as that due to uranium, may cause a temporary nitrogen retention. A consideration of all the facts here presented allows us to conclude that although it is not possible to demonstrate that an experimental nephritis may be purely tubular or purely vascular, which is in accord with our clinical and pathological studies of human material, it is possible, if we combine the results of anatomical, physiological and chemical study, to recognize lesions which are predominantly tubular or vascular, or which change rather sharply from one to the other type, and are, therefore, of great value in the study of the problems of nephritis.
The experimental study of poliomyelitis has yielded a large number of important facts relating to the spontaneous disease in man. The nature of the virus has been discovered, many of its properties have been ascertained, some of its immunity effects have been established, the clinical and pathological peculiarities of the disease have been elucidated, and a basis has been secured on which to develop measures of prevention.
Highly dilute solutions of the alkaline oleates, which do not suffice to alter appreciably the morphology or reproductive power of the pneumococci, nevertheless produce profound changes in their structure. Pneumococci treated with sodium oleate become more subject to autolysis, as is indicated both by the rapidity and the perfection of the process of self-digestion, and at the same time they become subject to serum-lysis. The serum-lysis of the soaped pneumococci tends to be incomplete with normal serum and to be perfect with an immune antipneumococcus serum. When normal serum is employed, the surviving pneumococci subsequently multiply either in the test tube or in the animal body, in the latter case producing fatal infection. When, on the other hand, an immune serum is employed, lysis is complete, no multiplication occurs, the test tube mixture is sterilized, and the inoculated animal is protected from infection. The inhibition of their activity which the soaps ordinarily suffer in the presence of protein, can be prevented by the addition of an appropriate quantity of boric acid, so that suitable mixtures of serum, soap, and boric acid can continue to exert a deleterious and solvent influence on the pneumococci, and the effect is greater when immune serum is employed in the mixtures. Infection can not only be prevented when the mixture of immune serum, soap, and boric acid is added to the pneumococci before injection into the peritoneal cavity of small animals, but the infection can likewise be prevented when a therapeutic injection of a mixture of the three substances mentioned is made to follow the inoculation of normal, highly virulent diplococci. The limits of the activity of the therapeutic mixture are determined, in part by the amount of protein to be overcome, and in part by the peculiarities of the infection occurring in highly susceptible animal species. The virulence of the pneumococci is somewhat diminished by the soap treatment, but the treated organisms are not rendered more subject to phagocytosis. It would appear that the action of the soap is exerted upon the lipoidal moiety of the bacterial cells, through which they are rendered more pervious to serum constituents and brought under their deleterious and dissolving influence. The changes in the pneuocci here described probably have a prototype in the resolving exudate of a pneumonic process; so that it may be considered that they occur in the animal body in the course of spontaneous infection and constitute one of the conditions of the conquest of the organism by the body's forces. A certain conformity exists between the manner of destruction of the pneumococci in a pneumonic exudate and that in the artificially prepared soap-serum mixtures. In order to imitate outside of the body the conditions of the removal of pneumococci within the body, it does not suffice merely to study the reactions to leucocytes and serum and to conclude from these reactions the means which the body employs for the disposal of the diplococci; but it is necessary to invoke still other factors, among which are the effects of chemical substances present in exudates, of which the soaps represent one class. The failure hitherto to unify the reactions in test tubes with those occurring in the body in connection with the pneumococcus may be due to the fact that account was not taken of this class of chemical bodies. Whether the principle here presented can be made applicable to the treatment of local pneumococcus infections in human beings is a pressing question. Its application to the treatment of local infections, to the seats of which the serum, soap, and boric acid mixtures can be directly applied, particularly after evacuation of an inflammatory exudate, seems to offer promise.
These experiments indicate that, in obstructive jaundice, the bile which escapes from the liver is absorbed by the hepatic capillaries and carried by the blood to the kidneys. The presence of a thoracic duct fistula influences in no way the development of icterus after total obstruction of the common bile duct. Bile pigments, sufficient to give a Salkowski test, may or may not appear in the lymph of the thoracic duct in such experiments, their appearance possibly depending upon the rapidity of bile secretion and the amount of lymph flow. Chronic icterus developing in an animal with a thoracic duct fistula gives an interesting distribution of bile pigments in the body fluids. The lymph and pericardial fluid contain the same amount, which is much less than the content of bile pigment in the blood serum and urine. It seems clear that in both acute and chronic obstructive jaundice the lymphatic apparatus takes no essential or active part in the absorption of bile pigments from the liver. At best, the lymphatic system is a secondary factor in the mechanism of jaundice.
1. Chloroform anesthesia for two hours or more will cause more or less central liver necrosis in dogs, depending on the length of the anesthesia and the susceptibility of the animal. 2. If the fibrinogen of the blood of such an animal be estimated at intervals, it is found that this proteid shows a drop corresponding to the amount of liver necrosis. 3. By administering chloroform, the fibrinogen may be almost eliminated from the circulating blood, and the poisoned animal may bleed for hours from small skin pricks or cuts. 4. The liver can recover from a grave injury due to chloroform and return practically to a normal condition in about ten days. 5. The fibrinogen reappears in the blood as the liver effects its repair. It seems that the quantity of fibrinogen present is a good indicator of the liver efficiency and a fairly accurate index of the amount of liver injury. 6. Shortly after the recovery of the liver from an injury due to chloroform, one may find an excess of fibrinogen in the blood. 7. In severe cases of chloroform poisoning, the calcium of the blood was normal or slightly increased, and the thrombin was normal. 8. These experiments give no evidence that the formation of thrombin or prothrombin is dependent upon liver activity. 9. The hemorrhages of chloroform poisoning are due not to lack of blood clotting but to inefficient coagulation. The clot has not the body and toughness supplied by the fibrinogen, and is, therefore, unable to check even capillary hemorrhage. 10. Fibrinogen is either formed in the liver or is wholly dependent upon liver activity for its production.
The work recorded above has served to corroborate the observations of other writers, notably of Noguchi, that in many human sera, if not in all, there develop, on standing, anticomplementary bodies which are delicately thermolabile, being inactivated by heating to 56 degrees C. for fifteen to twenty minutes. It has appeared that these bodies may occasionally be present in sera which, after heating, may develop the thermostable anticomplementary body referred to by other authors. It has become evident also that the speed of development of the thermolabile anticomplementary body in different sera is subject to much variation. The thermolabile body appears as the complement disappears. The question arises whether the thermolabile anticomplementary body may not be originally present in the serum, temporarily masked by the native complement. This would seem improbable from the fact that titration has shown that 0.1 and 0.2 cubic centimeter of the inhibiting serum will often inhibit as much as 0.6 cubic centimeter of fresh guinea-pig complement, a quantity superior to the amount of complement present originally in the antihemolytic serum. It seems, therefore, that the anticomplementary body must actually be formed in the serum during the period of preservation. The thermolabile antihemolytic body studied by us is like the thermostabile body investigated by Noguchi, in that it inhibits alien as well as homologous complement; it is unlike the thermostabile body, however, in that it cannot be absorbed from serum by digestion with red cells, nor does it render the treated cells more resistant to hemolysis. The thermolabile body may be removed from inhibiting sera by precipitating the globulins. A solution of the glotmiins then manifests a thermolabile anticomplementary action. No relationship between a clinical condition and the appearance of these bodies in the sera, has been found. As a practical result these studies have shown, as have those of Noguchi, that the complement fixation tests should never be made with certain sera which have been preserved for some time without inactivation.
The liver tissues of man and certain animals (dogs, rabbits, guinea pigs, etc.) yield, upon alcoholic extraction, various substances which may be divided by their physical and chemical properties into several groups. While many substances are present in the alcoholic extract, the ones possessing antigenic properties are comparatively few. The latter are responsible for the antigenic properties exhibited by the whole alcoholic extract. The substances extracted with alcohol were fractionated into the following four groups. (a) Substances Insoluble in Ether and Hot Alcohol.-These are chiefly proteins and salts. The proteins are probably the minute particles of larger molecules held in apparent suspension in alcohol until all other substances are removed. The water extracted from the tissues and admixed with alcohol is also an essential factor in extracting these particles in an alcoholic solution. The salts present are the usual physiological constituents of the liver, notably, sodium chloride. The quantity of these substances extracted with alcohol varies greatly with different specimens. Biologically considered, they are neither markedly hemolytic nor anticomplementary and possess no antigenic property for the Wassermann reaction. It is important, however, to note that the proteins bind complement when mixed with certain active human sera. For this reason a preparation of antigen containing this group of substances is unsuitable for use in combination with an active serum, and should, therefore, be rejected. (b) Substances Insoluble in Ether and Soluble in Hot Alcohol.-This group contains soaps, cleavage products of proteins, and small amounts of the bile salts. Soaps and bile salts are very strongly hemolytic and are absolutely unfit for use as antigen. Moreover, their antigenic properties are very slight. It is best to eliminate this group of substances from the preparation of antigen. The quantity of the substances of this group extracted from different specimens of tissue is very variable. (c) Substances Soluble in Ether, Alcohol, and Aceton.-In this group are found varying amounts of fatty acids, both saturated and unsaturated, some neutral fats, cholesterin and many unidentified lipoidal bodies. This group causes either hemolysis or inhibition, of hemolysis. In other words, it is anticomplementary as well as hemolytic in the majority of preparations. At the same time, in some preparations it is, to a certain extent, antigenic. This great variation in the amounts of these substances in given extracts renders their presence in the antigen preparation undesirable. It is not denied, however, that, when added in adequate quantities, some of these substances may improve the activity of the antigenic lipoids. (d) Substances Insoluble in Aceton.-This group of substances consists of phosphatids. The best known among them is, of course, lecithin. Besides lecithin, however, there must be various other phosphatids present in this fraction. It will be noticed that the precipitate formed by mixing the ethereal solution with aceton contains a certain amount of lipoids insoluble in ether as well as in alcohol. Before the fractionation in aceton, all lipoids were soluble in ether or ethyl alcohol. Further analytical work on the nature of the phosphatids contained in this fraction is necessary. This fraction, in general, is more constant in amount in the various liver extracts. Biologically considered, it is the most important. It is usually non-hemolytic, frequently anticomplementary, but much more strongly antigenic than the other fractions. The antigenic strength varies with different preparations, being almost absent in the extracts derived from fatty livers. An aceton insoluble fraction may be strongly antigenic without any other auxiliary effects, or may be accompanied by an anticomplementary property. This fraction does not cause the so-called non-specific reaction with an active human serum. For these reasons it is recommended (as Noguchi has repeatedly done before) that the antigen should be selected from the aceton-insoluble fractions. Iodine Value in Relation to Antigenic Value.-Speaking generally of the aceton-insoluble fraction, a high antigenic value is associated with a high iodine value of lipoids obtained from the liver and heart. This rule does not, however, apply to the corresponding fraction from the brain. Standard Antigen.-The preparation of a standard antigen for Noguchi's method for the diagnosis of syphilis is given just before the summary. The directions will enable one to make a stock solution, from which, at any time, a suitable antigenic emulsion may be obtained.
The following conclusions may be drawn from the foregoing series of experiments. The complementary activity varies within a definite limit in different specimens of guinea pig serum. With sera which stood in contact with the clot for twenty hours, the strongest and weakest were in the ratio of 0.015 cubic centimeter to 0.04 cubic centimeter. The former was 2.66 times stronger than the latter. The variation observed with the same series of sera after forty-six hours was still more striking. The strongest was 0.013 cubic centimeter, and the weakest, 0.06 cubic centimeter, that is, the former was 4.6 times stronger than the latter. These findings agree with those made by Massol and Grysez. The variations were not so marked with the majority of sera. It is noteworthy that a large number of the sera gained in the complementary activity when remaining in contact with the clot for forty-six hours, while some sera became weakened during the same length of time. The amount of serum fixed by given constant quantities of syphilitic serum and antigen varies much more markedly than the variations in their complementary activity. One serum failed altogether to be fixed. On the other hand, one sample of serum was so easily fixable that 0.24 cubic centimeter (corresponding to 9.6 complement units of this specimen) disappeared, while the average quantity fixed was only 0.098 cubic centimeter (corresponding to 4.64 complement units). The normal standard of fixability was shown in about 50 per cent. of the specimens examined. If the zone of normal fixability is enlarged in both directions by one unit, the percentage of normal fixability would become 65.8. There is no definite relationship between the complementary activity and the fixability of a given specimen of guinea pig serum. The facts derived from our present experiments, especially in regard to the exceptions in the fixative quality of this serum, demand the utmost precaution from those intending to employ it for diagnostic purposes, as, for example, in the Wassermann reaction. No quantitative work is possible with the complement fixation reaction unless the experimenter is capable of determining the fixability of the serum in use. One of us (Noguchi) has long realized this source of error, and in order to reduce it he has advised the employment of a mixture of sera from more than two guinea pigs.
1. The maximum activity of an antihuman hemolytic amboceptor may be obtained by employing the homologous or heterologous complement, according to the variable relations existing between the species furnishing the amboceptor and the one supplying the complement. Thus, some amboceptors are best reactivated by the complement of the same species, while others may act most strongly when reactivated with the complements of certain suitable heterologous species. 2. From the above it is clear that the complementary activity of a given serum may be very variable according to the varieties of amboceptors employed. In expressing the complementary activity of a serum, the species of the host of the amboceptor must always be stated. Thus, one serum may have many different complementary titers according to the amboceptors used. A similar variation in the titers of the amboceptors occurs when a variety of complements are employed. 3. Certain species of animals (pig and sheep) yield sera which are comparatively poor in reactivating most varieties of antihuman amboceptors. The complements of these species deteriorate rapidly. 4. The serum of chicken contained but little complement for the amboceptors derived from the mammalia, while the amboceptor from the chicken was only poorly, or not at all, reactivable by the complements contained in the mammalian sera. The serum of pig was the only variety which reactivated this amboceptor in a fair degree. 5. For the fixation tests guinea pig complement is the most favorable. This complement is also the most active and durable of those which have been studied. The complements of pig and sheep are quite fixable, but their weakness and rapid deterioration render them unsuitable for fixation purposes. Rabbit complement is quite active but is not easily fixable. Goat complement is, as already stated, difficult to fix, in spite of its strong complementary activity. The other complements are unsuitable because of their feeble complementary activity. 6. For fixation tests the antihuman amboceptors produced in the rabbit and guinea pig are suitable. They are, moreover, very active and do not cause the phenomenon of non-fixation. The amboceptors from other animals are unsuitable, as we cannot find a complement which strongly reactivates them. The amboceptor from the goat is unsuitable because of the danger of masking the fixation phenomenon by subsequent hemolysis. 7. In summing up, we arrive at the conclusion that the rabbit is the best animal for producing antihuman amboceptor, and the guinea pig for supplying complement. The guinea pig produces a good amboceptor, but its small size renders it second in choice. So far, no other animals have been found useful for the fixation experiments.
The fixing property of a specific precipitate and of syphilitic serum in the presence of certain antigenic lipoids, can be removed by adding certain non-complementary proteins of blood serum or hen's egg. This disappearance of the complementary activity in the syphilis reaction, as well as in the true Bordet-Gengou reaction, is a phenomenon which incidentally accompanies the fixation of certain serum constituents, some of which possess a complementary activity. The presence or absence of the complementary property in these protein components does not influence fixation. Whether the disappearance of the complementary activity during the phenomenon of so-called fixation is due to a mechanical precipitation of the molecules through absorption or whether it is due to a physico-chemical alteration of the active molecules, is unknown. It is more probable that a chemical interaction takes place in the case of the syphilis reaction. Certain sera, for example, those derived from man and goat, show a low fixability. It is interesting to note that the fixability is gradually diminished when these sera and egg-white are heated to a temperature above 56 degrees C., and totally disappears at 85 degrees C. The coagulation of proteins with absolute alcohol or by boiling, destroys their interfering property. The fact that the fixation is not selectively directed towards complement, has a very important meaning for exact serology. The one-sided accuracy as to the complementary unity is no longer sufficient for quantitative work. Both the complementary and the volumetric unity of a serum serving as the source of complement should be taken into consideration. Besides, the fixability of the sera of various species of animals must also be considered. From these facts a formula may be derived for deciding the degree of suitableness of a serum. see PDF for Equation X is the degree of suitableness; K, the species constant for the fixability; P, the complementary activity; and V, the volume of serum. It will be seen that the suitableness is proportional to the fixability constant and the complementary unity, and inversely proportional to the volume of serum employed. As to what species yields the largest value for X, we refer the reader to our studies published elsewhere.
The cutaneous lesions in pellagra consist of an early erythema, or, in occasional cases, of vesicles or bullous formations which are followed by hyperkeratosis and pigmentation, resulting in a dry, dark brown scaliness. These various lesions are similar to those normally produced by the action of sunlight, but are much more marked. The histological phenomena of the erythematous and bullous stage are those of a mild acute inflammatory reaction, together with a degeneration in the superficial layers of the corium. Following this degeneration, which involves not only the general connective tissue but the connective tissue of the blood vessels, there is a reparative change evidenced histologically by an increased cellularity of the corium and the presence of fibroblasts. The capillaries also are increased in number and much dilated. Apparently as a result of this increased vascularity of the corium, there is an increased proliferation of the epithelium resulting in a thickening of the epidermis. This increase in thickness of the epithelial layer is especially marked in the prickle cells and the stratum granulosum. In the later stages, in an effort to secure a firm basement membrane, the epithelium is seen to dip down deeply into the rarefied connective tissue. About the blood vessels during the reactionary process are found collections of lymphoid cells, a few plasma cells, but no mast cells or eosinophiles. That the irritant producing the degeneration in the corium is sunlight in the presence of some predisposing factor, is suggested by the enormous increase in pigment formation in the epithelial cells and by the large number of chromatophores in the superficial layers of the corium. This pigmentation is autochthonous in both types of cell. There is no reason for believing that the pigment is formed in the cells of the corium and thence discharged into the epithelium, or that the reverse process takes place. The predisposing factor inducing the changes in the corium is, apparently, a lessened resistance of the epithelium to the violet and ultra-violet rays, due to some metabolic insufficiency on the part of the epithelial cells. Further observation may justify the conclusion that throughout the body, pellagra is a disease essentially of the epithelium, including the nervous system, this pathological condition manifesting itself by an insufficient or altered function.
1. Hypertrophy induced by the production of aortic insufficiency involves all the chambers of the heart. The greatest absolute increase in weight is in the left ventricle. The remaining segments, arranged in the order of decreasing increments are septum, right ventricle, and auricles. The greatest relative increase is also in the left ventricle, but the auricles show a relative hypertrophy greater than that of the septum or right ventricle. 2. The co-hypertrophy of the auricles is not due to an altered venous pressure, but results from an increased force of auricular systole. 3. The heart shows an increase in weight within one week after the production of aortic insufficiency. The increase in weight is due only in part to an increased water content.
The so-called syphilitic antibodies can be removed from a serum by means of absorption with barium sulphate. The removal is due either to an adsorption or a mechanical absorption. The activity of the syphilitic antibodies is thereby unimpaired. The readiness with which the absorption is accomplished with barium sulphate varies considerably with different syphilitic sera. That barium sulphate exerts the same absorbing effect upon non-syphilitic serum components is made evident by the interfering property which the latter manifest in the absorption experiment of the syphilitic antibodies. The selective removal of the serum components, other than the syphilitic antibodies, by means of barium sulphate absorption is, therefore, impossible. On the other hand, a partial removal of these components, with but little removal of the syphilitic antibodies, may be effected when the content of a given serum is poor in syphilitic antibodies and comparatively rich in the indifferent serum components. But this is impossible if the conditions are reversed. The main reasons why some negative syphilitic sera may be so modified by the barium sulphate treatment as to give positive reactions, are explained below, but these apply only to those methods in which inactivated serum is employed. The inactivation reduces the antibody content to about one-fourth to one-fifth of the original. When the serum is very rich in antibodies, this does not affect the result of the fixation test. But when the amount of the antibodies is small, the process of inactivation creates conditions quite unexpected. It may produce such a condition that a given amount of the serum contains, after inactivation, only one or two antibody units, while the other serum components remain undiminished. Here one must not lose sight of the vital fact that these apparently indifferent serum constituents are not at all indifferent in the fixation processes. They may possess affinities which are similar to those of complement for the fixing combination of syphilitic serum and antigen. Speaking quantitatively, one unit of the syphilitic antibodies plus antigen will fix 0.1 cubic centimeter of guinea pig complement, but this unit can also be saturated and blocked by nearly the same amount of the seemingly indifferent serum component of the serum to be tested. Moreover, the regular amount of inactivated serum used in the Wassermann system is 0.2 cubic centimeter, a quantity sufficient to saturate two units of the fixing combination. Fortunately, this self-saturation of the syphilitic antibody-antigen combination by the other serum components is not constant in occurrence, owing to the wide variations of the fixability of the serum components of man. Here the benefit of Wechselmann's procedure becomes obvious. By removing a surplus of the fixable indifferent serum components by means of barium sulphate, the serum is made to react positively, or more strongly than before the treatment with barium sulphate. This masking of the positive reaction through the self-saturation is liable to occur in any system in which inactivated serum is recommended. Another equally important factor in masking the positive reaction in a serum in which the antibodies are poor, is the presence in considerable amount of natural antisheep amboceptor in human serum. It is a plain and simple fact that an excess of hemolytic amboceptor renders a positive reaction feeble or completely negative. As we have shown in our present investigation, a hemolytic amboceptor can be removed from the serum by means of absorption with barium sulphate. Thus it is easy to understand why Wechselmann found that barium sulphate absorption improves the reaction in the original Wassermann system. The treatment of syphilitic serum with this salt can have a twofold benefit in the case of the original method of Wassermann; namely, the removal of certain interfering serum components and the removal or diminishing of the natural antisheep amboceptor present in the syphilitic serum. In the method of Noguchi, there is no necessity for applying the barium sulphate absorption. Noguchi recommends the use of unheated serum, hence the absolute amount of the serum employed is only one-half of the absolute amount of complement. Eventually an old serum may be anticomplementary and need inactivation, but if the result is doubtful in this instance, a fresh serum from the same patient may be secured and subjected to reëxamination. In this method there is no danger of introducing an amount of hemolytic amboceptor which is both unknown and uncontrollable, for the reason that human serum is usually devoid of isolysin (antihuman hemolytic amboceptor), and, if the latter is present, it never reaches the strength which shows any effect upon the hemolytic system employed. We conclude, therefore, that the barium sulphate absorption is to be recommended for the original method of Wassermann under certain conditions, but that it is unnecessary for the antihuman hemolytic system of Noguchi.
1. Under certain conditions, mechanical agitation destroys the complementary activity of guinea pig serum. It is most injurious when carried out constantly at a temperature of 37 degrees C., but it is extremely insignificant at 10 degrees C. After the first few hours at 37 degrees C., the destruction of complement proceeded much more rapidly, and after six hours it was almost complete. On the other hand, within one hour shaking had almost no destructive effect on complement, even at 37 degrees C. From this we may conclude that the several shakings which are necessary for fixation experiments during incubation do not modify perceptibly the outcome of the reactions. 2. The rate of destruction of the complement of guinea pig serum at temperatures above 45 degrees C. is progressively greater as it approaches 55 degrees C., at which temperature the activity is reduced in thirty minutes to one-thirtieth to one-fortieth of the original strength of the unheated serum; but it is not completely destroyed, as is commonly assumed. The velocity of destruction of guinea pig complement when exposed to 55 degrees C. for various lengths of time is found to be quite irregular, and not proportional to the length of time. This irregularity, however, presents a certain rhythm, a period of greater destruction alternating with one of less destruction.
Implanted mixtures of mouse embryo and tumor sometimes result in an excellent growth of both. To assure this, it is necessary that the tumor selected be one which proliferates slowly, because more active ones prevent the development of the fragments of embryo. Transplanted embryonic tissue (of the type used) does not, at its best, grow as rapidly or in so large a percentage of hosts as some tumors. The morphological relations between tumor and embryonic tissue in the mixed graft are often intimate. Apparently either may adapt the other to its structural purposes. Occasionally a direct union takes place between cancerous epithelium and that of the embryo, with result in pictures suggesting an origin of one from the other. This observation has considerable significance in view of the current reliance upon just such histological data to prove that cancer arises from normal epithelium.
1. Grafts of embryonic tissue obtained at operation and implanted in the mother, will grow well in case she no longer carries young. The growth is no more rapid than that in favorable nonpregnant aliens, but persists for a longer period without retrogression and results in a greater variety of tissues. The superiority of auto-transplantation over iso-transplantation is responsible for this fact. No evidence of a specific "growth-substance" peculiar to the pregnant state is furnished by the experiment. 2. When a mouse is implanted with embryonic tissue from her own uterus, and she still carries developing young, the fate of the grafts is very different from that just described. They are vascularized from the host but fail to grow or differentiate. Yet they do not die, and after pregnancy is concluded they may start to grow. The finding is strikingly like that noted by others of implanted tumor in pregnant hosts. It seems probable that some general factor affecting the growth of implanted tissues is here concerned.
The results in these experiments seem to justify us in concluding that the growth of mouse tumors in rats is very definitely promoted by mouse-rat parabiosis, the percentage of " takes" being markedly increased, the rate of growth accelerated, and the duration of active growth extended to at least seventeen days. These findings are in accord with Ehrlich's hypothesis, although, on account of the complexity of the factors involved in such experiments, other explanations may be advanced.
1. The description of two distinct types of aestivo-autumnal crescentic parasites given by Craig in Osler's Modern Medicine (with difference in extremities, amount and form of pigment, double-outline, etc.), I have been unable to confirm. 2. The crescentic parasite is throughout its entire existence extracellular (i. e., not within the substance of the red corpuscle, but attached to its surface). It develops from the familiar small ring-form parasite, retaining a circular contour until fully matured. 3. The very young ring-form parasite has no capsule; the macrogamete has one during its development and sexual activity; while the microgametocyte has it only during its development. 4. The Sexual Cycle of the crescent may occur in the circulating blood of its human host. This cycle is probably very rapid, for practically the whole cycle can be seen in a few smears taken from one puncture. The microgametocyte, or male, develops a flagellum (microgamete) which, after the parasite has assumed the crescentic phase, leaves the body of the parasite and enters the body of the macrogamete, or female, during its existence as a round body. Fertilization is then accomplished. 5. The microgametocyte, after the escape of the flagellum, shows evidence of degeneration and is probably cadaveric. 6. After fertilization, the macrogamete assumes the crescentic form, reaches the reproductive phase and undergoes sporulation, the product of which appears to be the small ring-form parasite, Renewed infection of the red cells then takes place. 7. That the sexual cycle is not seen oftener in the circulating blood of man may be due to one or more of the following reasons: (a) The process of reproduction may be and probably is very rapid (some forms of protozoa are exceeded in rapidity of reproduction only by bacteria). (b)The cycle may usually take place in some of the internal organs. (c) It may be that the sexual cycle occurs in the peripheral blood only at intervals, when it becomes necessary for the parasite to renew its exhausted vitality. (d) The occasional occurrence of the sexual cycle in the circulating blood may be due to some slight chemical change in the composition of the host's blood serum. 8. I find no good evidence of conjugation-forms in aestivo-autumnal malaria. I found some of the young ring form parasites in close approximation or overlying each other. As the sexual cycle does take place in the blood of man, such a process of conjugation would seem unnecessary, unless it occurred as an atypical process. The fact that the crescent is more resistant to quinine than the other varieties of malarial parasites might be explained by the presence of a capsule which appears to protect the parasite, certainly during the sexual phase and probably during the " resting " period (when not undergoing sexual changes). The youngest form of ring parasite shows no evidence of encapsulation. This may explain the fact that quinine is best administered just before the paroxysm when the parasite is undergoing segmentation.
1. Two important methods for the study of malarial pigment are described. (a) A method for obtaining a solution of malarial pigment from fixed tissues without the removal of a trace of hemoglobin from the red blood corpuscles. (b) A method for obtaining an iron reaction in malarial pigment. 2. By comparing the bleach reactions and solubility of melanins and malarial pigment, the dissimilarity of the two classes of pigments has been demonstrated. 3. The spectroscopic examination of a solution of malarial pigment proves conclusively that the pigment is hematin. 4. It is suggested that the action of a proteolytic enzyme of the malarial parasite upon the hemoglobin of the red blood corpuscle is the most probable mode of elaboration of malarial pigment. 5. The difficulty with which the human organism disposes of malarial pigment indicates that the production of hematin cannot be considered as a normal intermediate process in the formation of bile pigments from hemoglobin.
From a study of strongyloides infections in man and animals in this region, it has been determined, in confirmation of the view of Grassi, Calmette, and others, that they are not causative factors in the production of diarrhea. The mother worm, however, burrows into the mucosa and deposits her ova there. Certain tissue reactions take place and are evidenced by the cellular proliferation in those portions of the intestines occupied by the nematodes. In animals, there is an associated anemia, not positively attributable to the strongyloides, but, on the other hand, not attributable to any other cause. It is possible that S. stercoralis may cause some degree of anemia in man. The amount is indeterminable in this region among hospital cases on account of the associated hookworm disease or malaria. Portals of entry for various microörganisms are made by the female mother worm and her larvae in the small intestine, and, while no case of general bacterial infection has been proved to have arisen in this way, its occurrence is possible and highly probable. In the cultures of strongyloides of man, there is among natives, who presumably are infected with purely tropical strains, a very marked predominance of development by the indirect or sexually differentiated mode, in some cases, an absolutely pure culture of the indirect mode larvae being obtained. There are, however, natives, cultures from whose stools contain from a single filariform larva of the direct phase up to a very definite predominance of this mode. Cultures from natives of the temperate zones contain a marked predominance of the direct phase larvae. The presence of the filariform (direct mode), larva is perhaps best accounted for by its being an attempt at more perfect parasitism (Stiles). From a correlation of culture study with the results of a histological examination of the invaded mucosa, this explanation of the derivation of the two phases is suggested. The mother worm in the intestinal tract has two kinds of progeny: (a) those expelled into the crypts or lumen, and (b) those imbedded in the intestinal wall. One lot becomes larvae of either the direct or indirect phase; the other lot of the opposite phase. It appears to me that the intraepithelial cell-developed larvae furnish the direct phase, while the embryos expelled directly from the mother become the indirect phase larvae. This will require for its confirmation a study of cultures in connection with a histological examination of the infected intestinal wall. Cold merely inhibits the development of the larvgammaaelig; into either the filariform (direct) or into the sexually differentiated adults, and does not alter the anlage. The resistant as well as the infecting form is the filariform larva, and all chemical larvicides must be directed against this form. Thymol and an alkaline cresol resin soap were found to be effective larvicides for the filariform larvae. Two new strongyloides of the monkey and ant bear are described. Cultures of these nematodes show a predominance of the indirect mode of development.
1. The sera of rabbits injected repeatedly with the nucleoproteins, globulins, and albumins of the liver and kidney of the dog give no evidence in vitro or in vivo experiments of organ affinity. The precipitin test offers no proof of the specificity of these sera for the proteins employed as antigens. 2. The anaphylaxis reaction applied to the same proteins indicates a slight relative organ affinity but no specificity as far as the respective protein fractions are concerned. The relative organ affinity resides, rather, in the globulin and albumin fractions than in the nucleoprotein fraction. Dog serum used both as a sensitizing and an intoxicating agent gives rise to very active cross reactions with organ proteins, thus failing to support the theory of organ or of protein specificity. 3. These results do not support the view put forward that nucleoproteins play an important part in the course of production of cytotoxic immune sera.
In conclusion, it may be said that the lesion described consists of a selective impregnation of the elastic tissue in the splenic trabeculae and vessels with the phosphates-and perhaps other salts-of calcium and iron. There is a further chemical change in the elastic fibers which may be expressed by the term "elacin." Degenerated and, especially, calcified elastic tissue-even more than calcification in general-seems to possess an affinity for iron salts. The iron incrustations occur principally in congested or hemorrhagic tissues. The etiological agent in this case is obscure. The only other example of this lesion in the spleen was in a case of Banti's disease. Many features of this case suggest a primary splenomegaly, but the evidence in its favor is not conclusive. Calcified elastic fibers, without the iron and elacin reactions, were also present in the liver, which was the seat of a recent, apparently biliary or infectious, cirrhosis. The elastic tissue of other organs showed nothing remarkable except in the skin, where the fibers were undergoing the usual senile changes.
The injection of virulent cultures of Bacillus influenzae into the subdural space of several species of lower monkeys is followed by the development of an acute inflammation of the meninges, corresponding in clinical, bacteriological, and pathological effects with influenzal cerebrospinal meningitis in human beings. Experimental influenzal meningitis in the monkey is a lethal disease which terminates fatally in from thirty-six hours to four days after the inoculation. The injected influenza bacilli produce their effects through multiplication in the course of which they penetrate from the subdural space into the general blood current, from which they may be recovered during life and at autopsy, as is also true of the spontaneous form of influenzal meningitis in man. By repeated injection, over a period of many months, of living virulent cultures of Bacillus influenzae into the goat, an immune serum possessing moderate agglutinating and high opsonic power may be produced, which is capable, when injected into the subdural space, of arresting the progress of an experimental influenzal meningitis, and of bringing about recovery in monkeys thus affected. As a result of the serum injections, the influenza bacilli in the meninges are more freely englobed by phagocytes, their number is reduced, their capacity of growth diminished, and the eruption into the blood arrested. Along with these effects go, hand in hand, cessation of the local inflammatory process and progressive amelioration of the symptoms of illness, to be followed usually by rapid restoration of health. In view of the highly fatal character of influenzal meningitis in human beings, the employment of an immune serum by subdural injection is recommended. Undoubtedly it will be necessary to apply the serum early and by repeated injections, by means of lumbar puncture, to secure beneficial results. The early application will, in turn, be dependent upon prompt bacteriological diagnosis, which can be made, as a rule, by the immediate microscopical examination of the cerebrospinal fluid without the employment of cultural methods. When possible, the microscopical diagnosis should be confirmed by cultural tests.
The results of these experiments are definite. There is, in the first place, a very striking difference with regard to precipitate formation between the acid and alkaline solutions of salvarsan when injected intravenously. Intravenous injections of alkaline solutions of salvarsan produce no precipitate in the blood, while injections of the acid solution nearly always give a precipitate. Furthermore, after injections of the acid solution, there is a striking difference between the blood from the right side of the heart and that from the left side. At the end of injections of an acid solution of salvarsan, a precipitate was seldom present in the arterial blood. Blood taken from the left ventricle at this time (at autopsy) also showed no precipitate in a large majority of cases; in eight experiments there was no precipitate, in three a doubtful trace of precipitate, and in one a definite small amount. On the other hand, blood obtained from the right ventricle and the lungs showed a very different condition. In ten out of twelve animals (rabbits and dogs), blood from the right ventricle contained a definite precipitate, and in a number of these cases the amount of precipitate was large. Blood squeezed from the lungs showed in eight out of ten cases at least as much precipitate as was found in the blood from the right ventricle. The results of injections of alkaline solutions of salvarsan, as pointed out before, are quite different from those produced by the acid solutions. In thirteen experiments upon dogs and rabbits, no trace of a precipitate was found in the arterial blood, the blood from the left ventricle, the right ventricle, or the lungs. There is no apparent difference in the process of precipitate formation whether salvarsan solutions and the blood are mixed in vivo or in vitro. In both mixtures the acid solutions produce a precipitate, while the alkaline solutions of salvarsan do not. These experiments have demonstrated the fact that a precipitate is present in the blood after an injection of an acid solution of salvarsan. One would expect that such a precipitate, consisting as it usually does of rather coarse particles, would, if brought to the medulla, cause immediate death by producing emboli. However, the freedom from such occurrences may be explained by the fact that the precipitate, which is abundantly present in the right ventricle, is only rarely seen in blood taken from the carotid or femoral arteries or even from the left ventricle itself. The fact itself, however, is quite difficult to interpret. It might perhaps be assumed that the precipitate is filtered out during its passage through the lung capillaries. If this is the case, we might expect intravenous injections of salvarsan to produce embolism in the pulmonary vessels with consequent fatal results. As a matter of fact, we have in the recent literature an instance which seems to point to such a result. Miessner (6) tried the effects of salvarsan in cattle which had foot and mouth disease. He used at first the acid solution, and though the dose was small, seven milligrams per kilo of body weight, all the animals (four) died in from ten hours to two days after the injection. They all showed labored respiration during or soon after the injection of salvarsan. He then decreased the dose to five milligrams per kilo of body weight, and repeated the experiments. He used also normal animals as controls upon those which had the foot and mouth disease. Both the sick and normal (control) animals showed labored respiration. One died after four days. At autopsy all organs except the lungs appeared to be normal. The lungs presented the following appearance: There were grayish yellow spots scattered irregularly over the surface. On the cut surface these were seen as grayish yellow spots the size of a pea, which appeared in groups and which sometimes filled a lobule completely. Other spots were surrounded by a small area of dark red lung parenchyma. The affected portion contained no air and felt solid. In adjacent parts the tissue seemed normal. A microscopic examination showed that the larger and smaller pulmonary arteries were filled with uniform, homogeneous, yellow masses. About the vessels there was a serous exudate. In brief, the changes seen indicated, he believed, that there was a thrombosis of the blood-vessels with inflammatory exudative changes of the lung parenchyma. Miessner states that a similar pathological condition was found in a normal control animal that died. He suggests that the acid solution of salvarsan might lead in man to a thrombosis of the pulmonary arteries. In support of this suggestion, he mentions a case reported to him by Ehrlich of a man who died following the injection of an acid solution. The lung picture in this case was somewhat similar to that which he had found in cattle. It may be mentioned in passing that Miessner found that alkaline solutions of salvarsan were far less toxic than the acid solutions. Animals (cattle) which received in an alkaline solution 400 milligrams of salvarsan per kilo of body weight did not show the least symptom of disturbance. In contrast to Miessner's results seem to stand my observations and those of Auer described in the introduction of this paper. Auer (5) found (in 8 rabbits) that no evident harmful effects followed the injections of very large doses of the acid solution, if they were given in a highly diluted form (one tenth per cent.). In my own experiments, it was found that a one fifth per cent. acid solution (3 rabbits) and even a one half per cent. solution (1 rabbit) produced no ill effects. The experiments described in this paper make it certain that the doses of the acid solution given to these last mentioned four animals must have produced a precipitate in the right ventricle and in the lungs, and yet the animals survived and showed no symptoms whatever of disturbance following the injection. This difference between our observations and those of Miessner might perhaps be explained by the assumption that the action of salvarsan in acid solution is more deleterious to cattle than to rabbits. Furthermore, Miessner seems to have injected the salvarsan in high concentrations. In one instance, in which figures are given, the drug was administered in a five per cent. solution. As mentioned before, Auer has shown the importance of the concentration. While in a one tenth per cent. solution twenty and thirty milligrams per kilo of body weight of the acid solution may be injected with impunity, even six or seven milligrams per kilo may prove rapidly fatal when injected in a one half per cent. solution. Our own results, however, leave us with two puzzling questions : First, if the acid solution of salvarsan causes such a coarse precipitate in the right ventricle and in the lungs, how does it happen that this precipitate does not bring about the death of the animal? Second, what is the real cause of the remarkable fact that this precipitate does not pass over into the arterial side of the circulation? Does the precipitate undergo a profound chemical or mechanical change while it passes through the lung capillaries? In future investigations we may try to answer these interesting questions. For the present, it is necessary to be content with the establishment of the bare facts as they are presented in the conclusions.
These results seem definitely to show, through animal experiments, that phagocytic immunity is to a high degree specific for the organism used in immunization, and that the amount of opsonin produced in the process depends to a great extent on the virulence of the organism. The negative results obtained with post-critical sera do not mean that opsonins may not be present (our five positive cases indicate their presence), but they emphasize strongly the fact that they are not formed to any great extent. Therefore this study adds further support to the view that although opsonic immunity is produced in pneumonia, it is not the only means of defense possessed by the body, and by itself it cannot explain the crisis.
1. Rat sarcoma may be cultivated in mouse plasma and guinea pig plasma, and the growth differs only in extent from that observed in rat plasma. The cells may show active wandering in guinea pig plasma after thirty days, if transferred at proper intervals to fresh medium. 2. Rabbit plasma is less suitable than that of guinea pigs and mice for the growth of rat sarcoma; growth is slow, but it may continue for twelve days. 3. The duration of growth of rat sarcoma in dog plasma is from two to three days. 4. The duration of the growth of rat sarcoma in pigeon plasma is four to five days. Transferring the tissue to fresh pigeon plasma does not lengthen the period of activity. 5. No growth whatever is observed of mouse and rat tissues in goat plasma. Studies of the fate of the cells indicate the presence in goat serum of a substance toxic for these tissues. 6. In preparations of rat sarcoma in human plasma, liquefaction of fibrin is regularly observed. The phenomena of growth consist in an outwandering of cells along the cover glass, and, after four to six days, the formation of giant cells. Such giant cells are produced in larger number in the cultivation of rat spleen. 7. The degree of suitability of the different kinds of alien plasma used as culture media for mouse and rat tissues does not go hand in hand with the closeness of relationship of the species. 8. Rat spleen may be cultivated as readily in foreign plasma as the virulent transplantable tumors.
Repeated experiments have proven that few, if any, of the ordinary laboratory and domestic animals are immune against infection by Bacillus leprae. As previously reported, the goat, horse, guinea pig, and many cold-blooded animals (Couret) have been found susceptible to invasion by this organism. Two factors are of great importance in effecting infection. In the first place, a sufficiently large number of organisms must be employed, and, what is still more important, second and subsequent inoculations are more liable to produce leprous lesions than are primary injections. Moderate doses used in the first inoculation of animals are comparatively harmless as regards their ability to induce lesions. Such preliminary doses, whether they consist of living or dead organisms, produce a condition of hypersensitiveness or allergy, which renders it possible by a second injection of viable bacilli to induce the development of a reactionary lesion. Lesions arising as the result of a second inoculation develop more rapidly, increase in size more quickly, and persist for a longer period than those taking place as the result of a single inoculation, even though very large doses are used. Moreover, the bacilli in these lesions are more liable to lead to metastasis and to a generalized infection. We regard the results of these experiments as having considerable bearing upon the development of the disease in human cases, since we find that it is chiefly among those living in prolonged intimate contact with leprous patients that leprosy develops. The proper interpretation of these findings is difficult and becomes, apparently, more complex the longer they are studied. We are accustomed to similar phenomena of anaphylaxis or allergy with protein materials and with certain bacteria, especially the tubercle bacillus. It is not surprising that a specific allergy or altered reaction should take place in animals previously injected with leprosy bacilli, either alive or dead; why, however, lesions should develop in which the bacilli continue to grow in animals which had recovered from previous injections, or the serum of which showed bactericidal properties and contained other specific antibodies, is not so easily understood. It is unnecessary in this paper to discuss the relative value of the different theories brought forward to explain the phenomenon of anaphylaxis. It must, nevertheless, be assumed that either as the result of the splitting of certain essentially non-toxic substances in the bacillus by specific ferment-like substances in the blood, which increase after a sensitizing dose, or by the joining of some body in the serum with certain substances in the bacilli, a toxic body is produced. Following the setting free or development of these injurious bodies, there results a cellular reaction, an area of local necrosis followed usually by the appearance of cells of the lymphoid and epithelioid type, and, especially if dead bacilli are used, by polymorphonuclear leucocytes. Such a reaction is usual in all allergic or anaphylactic conditions; but why the reaction should pre-dispose to the more or less permanent development of parasitic powers on the part of the bacilli is not so plain. The idea has been expressed by us, as the result of observations based chiefly upon the study of the changes in the tissues of human leprosy, that the presence of bacilli within the large multinucleated cells that are characteristic of the lesion is the result of active multiplication of the bacilli in these cells rather than of phagocytosis by the cells, although it is possible that their original entrance may be the result of phagocytic action. If this be the case, it is possible that, through the cellular reaction plus the necrosis of certain of the fixed tissue cells, a pabulum of split protein products results upon which the bacilli feed, and in which they find protection from the antibodies present in the blood serum. In our attempts to induce infection in various mammalian species with cultures of human leprosy, positive results have been obtained in almost every instance after the second injection of large numbers of the organism. In this manner, we have been successful in the production of lesions in the monkey, goat, horse, guinea pig, and mouse. The results of these experiments lead us to believe that the mechanism through which invasion and multiplication follows in these lower animals is similar to if not identical with that in man. A careful study of the progress of the disease in man together with the behavior of the organism in the monkey and the goat would suggest, at least, that the function of toxin production is, after all, of little use to the leprosy bacillus because it has seemingly acquired a highly parasitic existence; instead of which it is not only possible, but highly probable, that its defensive protection, whatever it may be, is enormously developed. After the inoculation of animals with either dead or living bacilli, the production of specific antibodies is induced; these do not develop in any considerable amount and apparently show no marked tendency to increase upon repeated injections. The tests of the sera in vitro indicate that the antisubstances are produced chiefly by the first few injections. Either the existence of some specific bacterial protective body, or what seems more probable, the protection afforded by the host cells in which the bacilli become ensconsed accounts, we believe, for the difficulty of producing in animals an antiserum of high potency. The idea, too, that the bacilli do not multiply to any great extent until they have entered certain cells of the host has, in a large measure, been verified by the artificial cultivation experiments. We know from our studies upon the biology of the organism that it will live for years in the most unfavorable conditions. This would suggest that during their sojourn in the tissue cells death as the result of autolysis rarely occurs, and as long as the cells can withstand the multiplication of the bacilli within and remain alive, so long are the bacilli protected from outside injurious influences, in consequence of which no disintegration of bacilli occurs to induce the production of immune bodies. On the other hand, death of the cells carrying the bacilli must occur from time to time, and this exposes large numbers of the organisms to the action of the body fluids, and, in consequence, to the condition of formation of specific antibodies.
1. Lesions of the testicle and scrotum of the rabbit produced by the treponema of syphilis and of yaws afford material for the study of chemotherapy, of serum reactions, and of immunity. 2. On experimental and clinical grounds, it appears that yaws can be cured with a smaller dose of salvarsan than is necessary to cure syphilis. 3. The spirochaetae of syphilis do not become resistant after repeated treatments with salvarsan. 4. Sodium cacodylate has little effect on the treponema of either disease. 5. Mercury, in a single intravenous dose, has a spirillicidal effect, but the necessary dose usually causes the death of the animal later from nephritis. 6. Potassium iodid, in a single intravenous dose, has no spirillicidal effect. 7. The complement fixation reaction is closely correlated with the course of an infection, as is shown by its onset and its disappearance after castration or treatment. 8. Reinfection during the course of a testicular lesion does not occur, but it occurs after regression, treatment, or extirpation. 9. Specific differences between Treponema pallidum and Trepanema pertenue can be demonstrated in infected animals treated with salvarsan and reinoculated.
In conclusion, it may be pointed out that this is the first time that Treponema pallidum of Schaudinn has been proven beyond all doubt to have been obtained in pure culture. The method of cultivation described would appear also to be suitable for obtaining indefinite generations of the microorganism. Doubtless slight modifications will adapt it to a larger number of strains and possibly to the cultivation of all strains and to still other species of treponema. Finally, it may now be accepted as established that the testicular lesions produced in rabbits by means of syphilitic materials are the result of the multiplication of the pallida and not of some associated indefinite parasite.
Subdural inoculation of tubercle bacilli of established virulence for guinea pigs and rabbits, produces in the dog a tuberculous meningitis, followed by paralysis and death. When suspensions of canine leucocytes are injected subdurally, following such inoculations there occurs uniformly a delay in the development of the paralysis and a prolongation of the life of the treated animal. In dogs inoculated with small doses of tubercle bacilli of low virulence, the development of paralysis has been prevented by this means for periods of seven months (up to the present date), while the untreated animals injected with the same cultures have all developed paralytic symptoms within a period of about four weeks.
The electrocardiographic records taken during vagus stimulation by pressure from children suffering with chronic heart disease have shown that the stimulation of the vagi in these cases is strikingly effectual. In some of the cases, a definite difference was demonstrated between the action of the right and left vagi. The control of the rate of the heart-beat seemed to predominate usually in the right vagus nerve, while the control of stimulus conduction from auricles to ventricles apparently predominated usually in the left vagus. This difference in the two nerves probably exists on account of the difference in their anatomical distribution, the right vagus going especially to that part of the heart which controls the rate of contraction, the sinus node above the right auricle, and the left vagus going especially to that part in which the conducting mechanism is found. Each nerve, however, has to a lesser degree the function which predominates in the other. The whole heart seems to respond, as a rule, more promptly to right than to left vagus pressure, and fairly constant differences have been seen in the effects which stimulation of each nerve has on the various waves of the electrocardiograms. The stimulation of each vagus may influence directly the contractions of the ventricles, causing great diminution in their force. Right vagus stimulation was followed at times by a complete dissociation of auricles and ventricles. The auricular rhythm was slowed sufficiently at this time to allow the ventricles, whose inherent rhythmicity is apparently unaffected by right vagus stimulation, to take up their own independent rhythm. The heightened ventricular rhythmicity in these cases allowed this to take place after only moderate slowing of the auricles. The independent ventricular rhythm was sometimes established in the region of the node of Tawara, for no disturbance of the ventricular portion of the electrocardiogram occurred. At another time, some other point in the ventricles inaugurated the stimuli of the independent ventricular contractions and an abnormal electrocardiogram resulted. The resemblance of our curves, showing dissociation, to those obtained during right vagus and left accelerator stimulation in dogs is definite. That analogy, the clinical picture, and the form of the electrocardiograms of these cases have led us to the belief that an important feature in the pathological physiology of these cases is hypertonus of the cardiac accelerator nerves. This factor, as a cause of symptoms and as a hindrance to the establishment of cardiac rest, may prove of great importance, against which a new form of cardiac therapeutics must be directed.
1. Splenectomy in dogs results in an immediate increase of cells in the thoracic duct lymph, due to the manipulation involved in the operation. This increase is soon followed by a low cell count, attributable to the removal of an important source of the cells under consideration. Several months after the operation, a normal cell count is reëstablished, due probably to a readjustment of activity on the part of other cell-forming tissues. 2. Pilocarpin injections after splenectomy result in an increase of cells, attributable to an increased activity of the respiratory organs and of the intestine. 3. After the injection of pilocarpin, splenectomy may increase the cell count, but it causes a decrease sooner than in cases of pilocarpin injection not followed by splenectomy.
I have described the successful cultivation of two distinct species of Treponema from the oral cavity of man. The species differ from one another morphologically and in respect to their cultural properties. As the two species have now been clearly separated and cultivated for the first time, I propose for them the names Treponema microdentium and macrodentium, respectively. Division along the longitudinal axis has been demonstrated for both Treponema macrodentium and microdentium. When the micro- and macrodentium are cultivated under imperfect anaerobic conditions, they undergo involution, but still continue to vegetate to some extent. Finally, a spiral organism has been cultivated and described that may be merely an involuted form of the macrodentium, or it may be a new species altogether.
A method for the direct cultivation of Treponema pallidum from human syphilitic lesions, by the employment of a solid medium, has been described. By means of it, three of the four strains worked with were successfully cultivated. The several pure cultures agree in morphological and cultural characters, grow only in the presence of sterile tissue under anaerobic conditions, and do not produce putrefactive odors. The morphology is typical under optimum cultural conditions; it becomes atypical when the conditions are unfavorable. In cultures, Treponema pallidum multiplies by longitudinal division. The process is usually symmetrical but occasionally appears to be asymmetrical. Inoculation of the pure cultures into the skin of two species of lower monkeys was followed by the production of lesions resembling the primary syphilitic lesion occurring in man and those caused in the monkey by inoculation of spirochaetae-containing serum from human sources. During the course of the positive inoculation in the monkey, the blood develops the property of giving a positive Wassermann reaction. Thus the relation of Treponema pallidum to this reaction is supported, and the identity of the cultivated strains with the species found in human syphilitic lesions established.
In my three cases of intestinal infantilism, the kreatinin excretion was more irregular than normally, and the kreatinin coefficient was low. Kreatin was found in the urine on a kreatin-free diet. The sum of kreatinin and kreatin was also irregular. The endogenous uric acid was irregular from day to day. The kreatin excretion is apparently lower on a high fat diet than on a high carbohydrate diet.
In three cases of intestinal infantilism, the excretion of nitrogen in the urine per square meter of body surface was low. The heat radiation was normal. In spite of the fact that the absolute quantity of nitrogen was low, the distribution of nitrogen and sulphur among the various nitrogen and sulphur constituents of the urine was in the normal ratio. The ammonia excretion was normal. The ethereal sulphates were slightly increased. The respiratory coefficient showed that the supply of glycogen had not been used up after eighteen hours' starvation.
The direct inoculation of a sarcoma of the fowl into the developing chick embryo or its membranes has yielded growths in many cases. The best results have been obtained with grafts of the living tumor tissue, but, as in the adult, growths can be engendered with dried tissue or with the Berkefeld filtrate of a tumor extract. When living tumor tissue is used, an actual transplantation occurs. The neoplasms developing are spindle-celled sarcomata, remarkably uniform in structure, and similar to those in the adult fowl, except that in the embryo the neoplastic cells are often extremely long and slender, and the structure of the growth is very loose. The membranes adapt themselves in a remarkable way to the support of the tumors. In them, the growth is seldom invasive; and while regional metastases are occasionally seen, none occur by the bloodstream, despite the predilection of the growth for this path of distribution in adult hosts. In the more resistant structures of the embryo itself, an invasive extension of the sarcoma occurs. Growths originally in the yolk-sac outside the chick may be carried into the latter during the course of development. Secondary growths in the viscera may cause the death of the host some weeks after hatching. In order to produce tumors in the embryo, the sarcoma cells or the agent engendering the growth must be brought into a direct association with the mesodermal tissues. This necessity is responsible for interesting differences in the location of the growths in the various membranes. The sarcoma will grow in the membranes of pigeon or duck embryos, whereas in adults of these species it will not do so; and in chicken embryos of different varieties, it grows uniformly well, a finding not obtained in adults. In embryo hosts of all the sorts mentioned, there is a total absence of the cellular reaction which in adults indicates resistance to the tumor's development. Relatively speaking, the embryo seems much more favorable than the adult as a host for the sarcoma.
The numerous attempts made in the last twenty-five years to reproduce lobar pneumonia in animals practically failed in all instances. By intrabronchial insufflation of pure cultures of pneumococcus in dogs, we produced experimental pneumonia successively in forty-two cases, with a mortality of at least 16 per cent. The fatal cases resembled closely lobar pneumonia in man. In the non-fatal cases, the pathological and bacteriological findings were again in accord with the findings in man. Clinically, however, the cases of nonfatal experimental pneumonia run a milder and shorter course than in man. In a few instances, lobar pneumonia has been produced experimentally also with the Pneumococcus mucosus and with Friedländer's pneumobacillus. The anatomical findings in these experiments have shown some characteristics agreeing with the findings in the pneumonias of man produced by these organisms. The quantity of the injected culture seemed to have a definite influence upon the outcome of the disease; in the fatal cases larger quantities of the culture had been injected. The animals were neither selected nor prepared in any manner. The experimental success did not, therefore, appear to depend upon the degree of resistance of the individual hosts. It is suggested that the uniformly successful results of the experiments were due to the obliteration of a large number of bronchi by the injected culture, through which mechanical effect a favorable opportunity was provided the pneumococci to develop and display their pathogenic activities consisting in the calling forth of a characteristic local, more or less effective, widespread, inflammatory reaction of the lung tissue.
When many cultures of Treponema pallidum, whether obtained from the testicular lesions produced in rabbits or directly from human cases of syphilis, are compared, certain definite differences in morphological character become apparent. The different specimens can be divided into thicker and thinner forms or types, and an average or normal form or type. The last is the common or most frequent variety, but the other two occur with sufficient frequency and retain their characters with such constancy as to constitute distinct varieties. Indeed, two of the varieties-the average and the thinner-occurred in association in a chancre and were separated afterwards in cultures. The gross cultural properties of the three varieties present no points of distinction. The lesions caused in the testicle of the rabbit differ according to the variety inoculated, and consist either of a diffuse or of a nodular orchitis. This is a highly important distinction, and if, in the study of a still larger number of specimens of pallida, it is maintained, it is capable of throwing light on certain important clinical features of the human syphilitic disease. The thinner variety of Treponema pallidum resembles in morphology Treponema microdentium, from which it is unmistakably distinguished by cultural characters. The morphological and pathogenic variations in cultures of the pallidum may constitute racial differences within the species.
Although the results of this study have been of a negative character, the conclusions that may be drawn from it have an important bearing on the true anatomical character of the islands. 1. Neither inanition nor the prolonged injection of secretin has any noteworthy effect upon the number, size, or structure of the islands of Langerhans in the dog's pancreas. 2. The islands of Langerhans in the guinea pig's pancreas are in no way altered in phlorizin diabetes. 3. The islands of Langerhans are not formed out of exhausted or degenerated acini, but develop from the ducts or acini with which they are often in direct continuity.
What is believed to be the first known case of heart-block arising in a dog as a result of an ingenerate pathological lesion is here reported. The auriculo-ventricular dissociation was of that degree known as relatively complete block and became apparent on section of the right vagus nerve. Stimulation of the peripheral end of the cut vagus failed to inhibit the ventricles, although complete inhibition of the auricles occurred. The same results were obtained during the ventricular acceleration produced by strophanthin, so that the failure of the vagus to inhibit the ventricles is not due to the latter's infrequent action, but more probably to a normal lack of direct chronotropic influence upon the ventricular muscle. These findings are similar to those obtained by Erlanger in experimental heart-block. To small repeated doses of strophanthin injected intravenously the heart reacted as follows: (a) irregular slowing of the auricles and conversion of the relatively complete into an absolutely complete a-v block; (b) a rise in the irritability of the cardiac muscle manifested by a rapidly progressing auricular and ventricular frequency, the ventricular frequency surpassing ultimately the auricular frequency; (c) complete arrest of the auricles, the ventricles continuing at their high rate; (d) sudden fibrillation of the ventricles and shortly afterwards arrest in diastole. There were found post mortem myxomatous-like thickenings at the free edge of the septal tricuspid leaflet and at the attached margin of the posterior aortic leaflet and along part of the right anterior aortic leaflet. There was also a grayish patch on the right side of the auricular septum above the auriculo-ventricular junction. The thickenings at the edge of the valves consisted of dense, circumscribed masses of what appeared to be new connective tissue. The same tissue was found pressing against the bundle along the greater part of the latter's course. There was considerable fatty infiltration of the auricular musculature immediately above the bundle and, to a slight extent, of the bundle itself. The fibers of communication between the auricular muscle and the node of Tawara were relatively few as compared with those of the normal heart. A review of the pathology of heart-block is appended, showing the present status of the question, concerning the relationship existing between disease of the a-v conducting system and the various grades of heart-block.
In summing up the results of these investigations attention is called in particular to the following facts. Dead pneumococcus culture material does not contain the active poisons formed in infection by living pneumococci. Characteristic lesions are not induced by dead cultures. But substances are present in the pneumococcus cells, and especially in culture filtrates free from pneumococcus cells, that give rise to an immunity in which the poisons of virulent pneumococci are inactive. In immune sera specific agglutinative, precipitative, lytic, and opsonic activities are present. But to the action of immune sera, virulent pneumococci are singularly insusceptible. This is due chiefly to qualities acquired by the organisms during their propagation through animals. In the test-tube this insusceptibility is overcome only under exceptional conditions which destroy these qualities or neutralize their effects. Lysis may be brought about by inhibition of growth, and phagocytosis by loss of virulence. In the tissues inhibition of growth and resistance to the poisons of the pneumococcus are brought about, but in ways more subtle if less exceptional, for both lysis and phagocytosis are active factors in the recovery of certain animals from infection.
From the results of this study of the action of immune sera on pneumococcus infection it is evident that immune sera vary greatly in their curative value. Immune sera possess protective action, but protective action is not necessarily indicative of curative action. Treatment with the serum of normal rabbits may prolong the course of pneumococcus infection in the rabbit. This action, however, is slight and not always manifest. Sera from animals immunized with dead pneumococcus cells which had been washed free from their products, failed to exert materially greater curative action than normal sera. Sera from animals immunized with culture filtrates free from pneumococcus cells possessed, in some instances, a slight curative value, but often this curative action was not apparent. In animals actively immunized, however, the presence of an immunity to culture filtrates was readily demonstrated. In the immunity produced by injections of dead culture material the strength was not sufficiently exalted for the sera to possess a practical curative value. It was only after immunization with virulent living cultures that the blood serum acquired marked curative action. After pneumococcus infection in the rabbit had become established, treatment with this serum induced crisis and cured the animals. From the results of the study of the mechanism of recovery it is evident that, despite the fact that virulent pneumococci are singularly insusceptible to the action of immune sera in the test-tube, pneumococcus infection nevertheless conforms to the general law of infection. Diphtheria and tetanus organisms give rise to powerful toxins, but the parasitism of these organisms is slight and their development is localized. Diseases produced by these organisms are toxemias and neutralization of their toxins by antitoxin puts an end to the disease. The pneumococcus gives rise to toxic substances which are less active or are active only in the body tissues, but the parasitism of this organism is marked and its development is rarely localized. Nevertheless, the manifestations of the disease arise from the action of the bacterial poisons on the tissues. The neutralization of the pneumococcus poisons by immune serum puts an end to the symptoms of the disease, but the pneumococci survive as harmless parasites until destroyed by lysis or phagocytosis. The neutralization of the pneumococcus poison may take place suddenly and completely as in crises; or, it may be incomplete with exacerbations of infection, as in lysis. Crisis, as it occurs in the lobar pneumonia of man and in the bacteriemia of the rabbit, is simply one phase of recovery, and recovery does not differ fundamentally, whether it is sudden and complete as in crisis, or incomplete and prolonged as in lysis, or whether the pneumococci are destroyed by lysis extracellularly as in the rabbit, or intracellularly as in the phagocytosis of the dog and man. Since the recovery of animals from pneumococcus infection differs in no essential from that of man, since the unaided protective mechanism of man as compared with that of susceptible animals is exceptionally efficient, and since it is possible by treatment with sera from animals highly immunized with living cultures of virulent pneumococci to cure pneumococcus infection in the most susceptible animals, it is difficult to conceive of the infection in man failing to yield similarly to the administration of such sera.
1. In plasma there exists a vasodilator substance specific for the vessels of the kidney. 2. This substance is a proteid of the albumin class and is precipitated by boiling and by alcohol. 3. It is present also in the serum. 4. It acts directly on the muscle coats of the arteries. 5. The process of clotting of the blood liberates a constrictor substance that acts on the renal vessels and also on the vessels of the limb. 6. This constrictor substance is not a proteid; it resists boiling, is soluble in alcohol, and acts directly on the muscle coat.
When intrabronchial insufflation of pure cultures of the streptococcus or of the influenza bacillus is properly carried out, it produces without fail a pneumonic lesion. This lesion is similar in its nature to the one known in human pathology as bronchopneumonia, and differs materially from the pneumonic lesion produced experimentally by the intrabronchial insufflation of pure cultures of the pneumococcus. Considering the fact that none of the dogs used in the experiments with the pneumococcus and none of those used in the present investigation were selected or prepared in any way, the conclusion seems to be unavoidable that the proper invasion of the microörganism is the determining factor in the development of pneumonia, the condition of the animal being only a minor element in this regard. Furthermore, since different organisms introduced in the same way and under conditions which are apparently the same produced distinctly different pneumonic lesions in animals of the same species, the further conclusion presents itself that the different types of pneumonia are produced by specifically different bacteria. However, further investigation may show that the differences in the nature of the lesion are due rather to the degree of virulence of the causative microörganism than to differences in the species; that is, that different lesions may possibly be produced by organisms of the same species, provided they possess different degrees of virulence. Further experimentation may also show that the condition of the animal and of the affected organ which, in the onset and development of the pneumonic disease, is, perhaps, unimportant, may be the leading factor in determining the course and outcome of the disease.
Injection of oil of turpentine into the peritoneal cavity of a dog calls forth immediately an exudate of fluid from the surrounding tissues. The amount of fluid reaches the maximum on the third day and has practically disappeared on the fifth day. The cell content of this fluid is very small at first, but increases rapidly. The type of the predominating cells also changes. In the early exudate the small mononuclear cells are numerous and the large mononuclears few. Later the number of large mononuclear cells is increased and ultimately the polymorphonuclear cells preponderate. Various forms of atypical cells also occur. Much of the fluid and many of the cells are removed by way of the thoracic duct. The counts of the cells in the thoracic duct and the estimates based on these indicate that the duct does not remove all of the fluid or cells from the peritoneal cavity. Much fluid is probably taken back directly into the blood, as are many of the cells. Some of the cells make their way to the lymph nodes, while many perhaps undergo complete autolysis in the serous cavity. The polymorphonuclear cells do not enter the thoracic duct in great numbers. Examination of the lymph from the thoracic duct in the case of my dogs showed the types of cells that are usually found there. The variation in small mononuclear cells is so related to the cell content of the peritoneal effusion as to indicate that the supply in the blood is maintained from this source. The form and staining qualities of the cells indicate that many of the small mononuclear cells are returned to the thoracic duct. The ratio of polymorphonuclear cells present in the lymph bears no definite relation to the other features of the process. The transitional cells were increased in number and in their ratio to other cells. The increase in the transitional types accompanies an increase in large mononuclear cells and a decrease in small mononuclears. None of the atypical forms of cells found in the effusion were seen in the lymph. The number of eosinophils is without apparent relation to the other features of the process. No polymorphonuclear cells containing the pigment injected were found in the lymph of the thoracic duct, and the number of mononuclear cells containing pigment was small. Much pigment was deposited in the lymph nodes. Detailed and definite conclusions as to the relation between the cells of the lymph and those of the effusion cannot be arrived at satisfactorily without repeated observations on the same animal. Dr. Warthin examined many of the smears from these cases and frequently controlled the conclusions regarding the various types of cells. Dr. P. F. Morse assisted me frequently with the operative procedures and with the routine counting of the cells.
An analysis of the results of the experiments reported in this investigation shows that the changes so frequently observed in tissues surrounding a growing tumor may be caused by different conditions. The development and growth of a malignant tumor depends upon a local interaction between tumor cells and organ cells. When the cells of a normal organ are capable of inhibiting tumor growth, then an impairment of the normal state of the parenchymatous cells of this particular organ is essential for the growth of the tumor. This "precancerous state" does not consist primarily of an inflammatory change in the adjacent connective tissue, as Ribbert and his followers maintain, but in a degeneration of the parenchymatous cells of the organ. If, in another instance, the cells of the normal organs are unable to inhibit the proliferation of the tumor cells, then no preparation of the cells of the organ for the tumor is necessary, i. e., no "precancerous state" is needed to enable the tumor to grow. On the other hand, the proliferating tumor cells injure normal cells, either mechanically or chemically, producing a condition that appears on superficial examination like that described as the "precancerous state." In reality, however, this condition is the resultant effect of the tumor growth and may be more correctly designated the "postcancerous state." In these conditions, then, von Hansemann's explanation of the phenomenon, and not Ribbert's, seems to be the correct one. Of still greater importance is the fact demonstrated in the last series of experiments; namely, that the general condition of resistance or immunity to cancer growth exerts a greater influence on the organism of the animal than any of the local conditions described above. The local resistance of a testicle to tumor growth in a generally susceptible animal may be overcome, but if an animal is made generally immune to the growth of cancer, neither the animal as a whole nor a single organ or tissue in it can be made susceptible to the growth of the tumor.
The analysis of the experiments described above indicates that tumors of the white rat or white mouse inoculated into parenchymatous organs acquire a different biological character from those inoculated subcutaneously. The latter are a great deal more benign in their behavior than human cancer or spontaneous tumors in the same species of animals. Tumors inoculated into organs, on the other hand, are quite identical in their biological behavior with the malignant tumors of animal and man. A conclusion must then be drawn, even a priori, that the method of inoculation into organs is a very important aid in the experimental investigation of cancer. It is true that the method is a great deal more complicated and time-consuming than the ordinary subcutaneous inoculation. The subcutaneous method is satisfactory for a number of cancer problems. One of these is the study of general susceptibility and resistance of the organism of the host to the inoculation of the tumors, and this is a subject of paramount importance in cancer research. On the other hand, the investigations of the writer (10) have shown that an animal may be susceptible to a subcutaneous inoculation of a certain tumor and resist the inoculation of the same tumor into the testicle. Undoubtedly this method of inoculation will reveal the existence of a number of other phenomena. The discovery of specific therapeutic measures is certainly the greatest problem in cancer research. A great deal of work has been done already on the subject, and the latest investigations of Wassermann on the chemotherapy of experimental tumors seem to be of great promise. But here also the therapeutic methods must be tried on animals in which the inoculations of tumor cells have been made into parenchymatous organs before the growths thus treated will have any analogy to human cancer. In this connection one must bear in mind the fact that all the empirical so-called specific cancer remedies, which are continually being devised, are usually successful in treating localized skin cancers and fail utterly in the malignant growths of the internal organs. It is comparatively easy to produce a localized necrosis and softening in a circumscribed growth of the skin and subcutaneous tissue, but whether the same result will be produced on a diffuse and better nourished tumor growing inside of a parenchymatous organ cannot be decided a priori. To determine this it is necessary to have experimental proof on animals in which the tumor was inoculated into organs.
In experiment I a group of ameboid cells was isolated from a culture of cardiac muscle sixty-three days old, and cultivated in plasma. After several passages, they formed a dense tissue from which ameboid cells radiated. The culture was divided into two parts. The part cultivated in plasma alone kept its morphological characters and continued to produce ameboid cells. The part cultivated upon silk in plasma became modified; the cells lost their ameboid characters, and were transformed into large elongated cells which were united in chains, or interlaced to form a network. In experiment II the round cells taken from a culture of connective tissue seventy-four days old multiplied rapidly. They transformed themselves into elongated cells and produced, after a few passages, a mass of dense connective tissue. From the tissue a large number of elongated cells were constantly growing. In both experiments the tissues originated from the ameboid or round cells extirpated from cultures that were sixty-three and seventy-four days old respectively. These cultures were still growing actively thirty and forty days later; that is, more than one hundred days after the extirpation of the original fragments from the organism. These experiments show that from old cultures it is possible to isolate and propagate cells that belong to a definite type. A tissue, formed by a pure strain of cells, can be obtained in this way, and this new method may be of value in cytological investigations.
The results in the group in which there was interagglutination differ in no striking way from those obtained in the group in which there was no interagglutination. It may be concluded, therefore, that the presence of isoagglutinins is of no importance for the final results of the homoplastic transplantation of arteries. From the conflicting evidence of the survival of muscular fibers in one case and their disappearance in many other cases, it may be concluded further that between animals of the same species there are unknown biological differences that prevent, in most instances, the survival of homoplastic transplanted arteries, although a survival does occur in some cases.
1. By introducing intravenously into dogs a solution of 5 per cent. ether in normal saline (0.9 per cent.), a satisfactory surgical anesthesia can be produced. 2. Associated with this anesthesia a glycosuria occurs in healthy adult dogs fed on a meat diet. 3. Normal saline (0.9 per cent.) introduced in exactly the same manner does not cause a glycosuria. 4. The glycosuria is, in general, associated with a hyperglycemia. 5. The glycosuria does not make its appearance until the condition of anesthesia has been produced. 6. The intravenous method of producing anesthesia employed in our studies eliminates largely the factor of asphyxia. 7. Consequently by this mode of administration ether may cause glycosuria without asphyxia. 8. The addition of ether to normal saline (0.9 per cent.) solution modifies the property of the latter to produce diuresis. 9. Associated with the intravenous administration of both the saline and the ether-saline solutions there occurs a rise of body temperature.
1. A mucin-producing spirochoeta has been obtained in pure culture from a case of pyorrhea alveolaris. This organism is an independent species of the genus Treponema and, as it is recognized for the first time, I propose for it the name Treponema mucosum. 2. Morphologically the mucosum is difficult to separate from the pallidum and microdentium, but, through its biological properties and animal reactions it is easily differentiated from all the rest of the spirochoetae. 3. The mucosum is not parasitic in the strict sense of the term, but exerts a certain pyogenous action when the tissue has been so injured by foreign substances as to enable it to survive. 4. The strong fetid odor in the discharge from pyorrhea alveolaris is due, at least in part, to the presence of the mucosum in the affected tissue.
1. A method for the pure cultivation of Spirochoeta duttoni, Spirochoeta kochi, Spirochoeta obermeieri, and Spirochoeta novyi is described in this paper. In vitro these strains reach their maximum growth after seven, eight, or nine days at 37 degrees C. For their multiplication they require the presence of a piece of fresh sterile tissue and a body fluid capable of forming a loose fibrin with the tissue. The presence of some oxygen seems indispensable for their growth, since they fail to grow in an atmosphere of hydrogen or in vacuo. No growth was obtained at room temperature. 2. From cultures that show a good growth subcultures can be made and the growth can be kept up in this way for many passages. 3. The pathogenicity of these organisms is not lost by cultivation, although there is a tendency for the virulence to become attenuated after growth in vitro has continued for a long time. 4. Longitudinal division has been observed and was followed under the dark-field microscope in fresh preparations from cultures. It occurs in all the species irrespective of the length of the organism. Transverse division seems also to occur, but I have not yet observed the entire process.
1. A method is described for obtaining pure cultures of Treponema pallidum and allied species of spirochaetae in fluid media. 2. The principle of the method is based upon the superposition of a favorable culture medium upon a less favorable one. 3. The method here described is not suited to the growth of spirochaetae when they are admixed with contaminating bacteria.
Rabbit leucocytes, injected into the basal meninges of dogs, in doses from 0.7 to one cubic centimeter apparently invariably cause death. Horse leucocytes, injected in the same amounts, cause death in about 25 per cent. of the dogs. . The injection of foreign leucocytes into the meninges of monkeys causes few if any symptoms. The injection of from one to three cubic centimeters of horse leucocytes into the meningeal cavities of dogs, simultaneously with the inoculation of the meninges with tubercle bacilli, causes a slight delay in the development of the paralytic symptoms in about half the treated animals. This delay, however, is very slight when compared with the remarkable prolongation of the latent period previously observed after treatment with dog leucocytes. The injection of foreign leucocytes into the meningeal cavities of monkeys has thus far given almost uniformly negative results. In one small group of monkeys, however, inoculated by the method of lumbar puncture, the injection of rabbit leucocytes has been associated with a prolongation of the latent period in one of the treated monkeys, and with a complete prevention of the subsequent tuberculosis in a second monkey.
The experiments have shown that extracts of tissues and tissue juices, under certain conditions, accelerate the growth in intro of the connective tissue from about three to forty times. This activating power was found in many tissues. It was much more marked, however, with the extracts of embryos, of adult spleen, and of the Rous sarcoma. The power diminished directly with the dilution of the extracts, and appeared not to apply to the tissues of a heterologous animal. The power was reduced when heated at 56 degrees C., and removed when heated at 70 degrees C. It was diminished markedly by filtration through a Berkefield filter and was completely suppressed by filtration through a Chamberland filter. Possibly the finding of the activating power of tissue extracts will have no immediate practical application. Nevertheless, it may be indirectly useful by leading to the discovery of some of the factors determining the growth of tissues and of the unknown laws of cell dynamics, and may ultimately throw light on the mechanism of the cicatrization of wounds.
Analyses of the principal known bases and acids of the feces in cases of infantilism in which excessive amounts of calcium are being lost, and comparison with cases which are normal in this respect, show that the fats, fatty acids, and volatile acids are not high, and lead to the conclusion that the loss of calcium is not secondary to the presence of large quantities of phosphates, fatty acids, or volatile acids.
1. The Negri bodies, as the etiological agent in rabies, present two general types or phases in morphology, in growth, and in reproduction. 2. These two phases are constantly cyclic in their development and correspond (1) to a multiplicative, or schizogonous, and (2) to a reproductive, or sporogonous, life cycle. 3. By the detailed study of these forms and their succeeding stages we are inclined to believe that the Negri bodies are definite protozoan parasites, and from a study of their life history we are led to place them in the suborder of Cryptocysts, or Microsporidia, of the Sporozoa, and more definitely among the Oligosporogenea of the Glugeidae family, which forms produce but one pansporoblast. With the recent advances in the growth of tissues outside the body, particularly the work of Carrel, Burrows, Harrison, Lewis and Lewis, and Rous upon the infectiousness of tumor extracts, with the results of Noguchi in cultivating pathogenic Treponema pallidum, important discoveries concerning the Negri bodies will undoubtedly be made in the near future.
1. The development of the polymorphonuclear leucocyte from a mesenchymal, lymphoid type of cell is possible in adult life and in vitro in chicken bone marrow. 2. These cells can rapidly proliferate by means of amitotic division of an unripe form very similar to, but smaller than themselves. 3. All the cells of chicken bone marrow can undergo a transformation to a type of cell resembling, although not proved to be identical with the cells of connective tissue.
1. The specific lipase of immune hemolytic serum is not necessary for hemolysis, but this does not prove the non-necessity of a lipolytic action in serum hemolysis, since a lipase is always present in the complement serum. 2. Serum lipase is found in the end-piece of split complement. 3. There is a parallelism between the lipase content and complement strength of the sera of different animals (man, rabbit, guinea pig, sheep, ox, cat).
During pneumonia the metabolism of inorganic substances deviates markedly from the normal. While chlorine, sodium, and calcium are retained in the body, potassium and magnesium are excreted normally or in excess. Two cases showed a definite loss of magnesium to the body in the febrile period. During the period of retention the chlorine content of the blood is distinctly lower than normally, the calcium content is apparently slightly lower, and the magnesium content tends also to be a little lower. The skin is shown, to play no special part in the chlorine retention. Since no organ or organs have been shown to store up large amounts of the retained substances, it is probable that they are spread diffusely throughout the body.
Intramuscular injection of salvarsan and neosalvarsan in rabbits always produces necrosis of the muscles. A much more intense reaction is produced by salvarsan than by neosalvarsan. The rate of absorption of arsenic following intramuscular injections of salvarsan is very slow, while following intramuscular injections of neosalvarsan between 75 and 85 per cent of the arsenic is absorbed during the first week. The subsequent absorption is quite slow.
1. On the surface of genital or anal lesions, either syphilitic or non-syphilitic, there may be found occasionally a spirochaeta resembling Treponema pallidum, but somewhat thicker than the latter. In general characteristics, this organism occupies an intermediary position between Treponema pallidum and Spirochaeta refringens. 2. The treponema was obtained in pure culture from two cases. For the organism the name of Treponema calligyrum is proposed. 3. Treponema calligyrum is non-pathogenic for monkeys and rabbits. 4. Treponema calligyrum can be distinguished from Treponema pallidum, Treponema microdentium, Treponema macrodentium, Treponema mucosum, and Spirochaeta refringens either by the morphology, cultural and biological properties, or all these conditions in combination. 5. Under certain cultural conditions Treponema calligyrum becomes thinner and may cause some difficulty of differentiation from a strain of the thick type of Treponema pallidum, especially when the latter is grown under conditions which tend to render it thicker. There is no such difficulty when the average and thin types of Treponema pallidum are concerned. On the other hand, by providing the calligyrum with conditions which lead to the appearance of thicker specimens and by supplying Spirochaeta refringens with conditions of growth that favor the development of individuals that are thinner and more regularly curved, the refringens may be made to resemble the calligyrum in general appearance; but under identical cultural conditions they can be readily distinguished.
